Dictionaries/dictionaries-master/sr/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1769 Y 28
SFX 1769 niti niti
SFX 1769 niti nim
SFX 1769 niti niš
SFX 1769 niti ni
SFX 1769 niti nimo
SFX 1769 niti nite
SFX 1769 niti nu
SFX 1769 niti nio
SFX 1769 niti nila
SFX 1769 niti nilo
SFX 1769 niti nili
SFX 1769 niti nile
SFX 1769 niti niću
SFX 1769 niti nićeš
SFX 1769 niti niće
SFX 1769 niti nićemo
SFX 1769 niti nićete
SFX 1769 niti niće
SFX 1769 niti ni
SFX 1769 niti nimo
SFX 1769 niti nite
SFX 1769 niti nih
SFX 1769 niti ni
SFX 1769 niti niše
SFX 1769 niti nismo
SFX 1769 niti niste
SFX 1769 niti njahu
SFX 1769 niti nivši

SFX 1770 Y 29
SFX 1770 ći ći
SFX 1770 ći gnem
SFX 1770 ći gneš
SFX 1770 ći gne
SFX 1770 ći gnemo
SFX 1770 ći gnete
SFX 1770 ći gnu
SFX 1770 ći gao
SFX 1770 ći gla
SFX 1770 ći glo
SFX 1770 ći gli
SFX 1770 ći gle
SFX 1770 ći gnuću
SFX 1770 ći gnućeš
SFX 1770 ći gnuće
SFX 1770 ći gnućemo
SFX 1770 ći gnućete
SFX 1770 ći gnuće
SFX 1770 ći gni
SFX 1770 ći gnimo
SFX 1770 ći gnite
SFX 1770 ći goh
SFX 1770 ći že
SFX 1770 ći goše
SFX 1770 ći gosmo
SFX 1770 ći goste
SFX 1770 ći gohu
SFX 1770 ći ći
SFX 1770 ći gavši

SFX 1771 Y 33
SFX 1771 nuti nuti
SFX 1771 nuti nem
SFX 1771 nuti neš
SFX 1771 nuti ne
SFX 1771 nuti nemo
SFX 1771 nuti nete
SFX 1771 nuti nu
SFX 1771 nuti nuo
SFX 1771 nuti nula
SFX 1771 nuti nulo
SFX 1771 nuti nuli
SFX 1771 nuti nule
SFX 1771 nuti nuću
SFX 1771 nuti nućeš
SFX 1771 nuti nuće
SFX 1771 nuti nućemo
SFX 1771 nuti nućete
SFX 1771 nuti nuće
SFX 1771 nuti ni
SFX 1771 nuti nimo
SFX 1771 nuti nite
SFX 1771 nuti nuh
SFX 1771 nuti nu
SFX 1771 nuti nuše
SFX 1771 nuti nusmo
SFX 1771 nuti nuste
SFX 1771 nuti toh
SFX 1771 nuti te
SFX 1771 nuti toše
SFX 1771 nuti tosmo
SFX 1771 nuti toste
SFX 1771 nuti njahu
SFX 1771 nuti nuvši

SFX 1772 Y 27
SFX 1772 tići tići
SFX 1772 tići dem
SFX 1772 tići deš
SFX 1772 tići de
SFX 1772 tići demo
SFX 1772 tići dete
SFX 1772 tići du
SFX 1772 tići tišao
SFX 1772 tići tišla
SFX 1772 tići tišlo
SFX 1772 tići tišli
SFX 1772 tići tišle
SFX 1772 tići tidi
SFX 1772 tići tidimo
SFX 1772 tići tidite
SFX 1772 tići tidoh
SFX 1772 tići tide
SFX 1772 tići tidoše
SFX 1772 tići tidosmo
SFX 1772 tići tidoste
SFX 1772 tići doh
SFX 1772 tići de
SFX 1772 tići doše
SFX 1772 tići dosmo
SFX 1772 tići doste
SFX 1772 tići tiđahu
SFX 1772 tići tišavši

SFX 1773 Y 37
SFX 1773 reti reti
SFX 1773 reti rem
SFX 1773 reti reš
SFX 1773 reti re
SFX 1773 reti remo
SFX 1773 reti rete
SFX 1773 reti ru
SFX 1773 reti arem
SFX 1773 reti areš
SFX 1773 reti are
SFX 1773 reti aremo
SFX 1773 reti arete
SFX 1773 reti aru
SFX 1773 reti ro
SFX 1773 reti rla
SFX 1773 reti rlo
SFX 1773 reti rli
SFX 1773 reti rle
SFX 1773 reti reću
SFX 1773 reti rećeš
SFX 1773 reti reće
SFX 1773 reti rećemo
SFX 1773 reti rećete
SFX 1773 reti reće
SFX 1773 reti ri
SFX 1773 reti rimo
SFX 1773 reti rite
SFX 1773 reti ari
SFX 1773 reti arimo
SFX 1773 reti arite
SFX 1773 reti reh
SFX 1773 reti re
SFX 1773 reti reše
SFX 1773 reti resmo
SFX 1773 reti reste
SFX 1773 reti rehu
SFX 1773 reti revši

SFX 1774 Y 28
SFX 1774 ti ti
SFX 1774 ti em
SFX 1774 ti eš
SFX 1774 ti e
SFX 1774 ti emo
SFX 1774 ti ete
SFX 1774 ti u
SFX 1774 ti o
SFX 1774 ti la
SFX 1774 ti lo
SFX 1774 ti li
SFX 1774 ti le
SFX 1774 ti eću
SFX 1774 ti ećeš
SFX 1774 ti eće
SFX 1774 ti ećemo
SFX 1774 ti ećete
SFX 1774 ti eće
SFX 1774 ti i
SFX 1774 ti imo
SFX 1774 ti ite
SFX 1774 ti eh
SFX 1774 ti e
SFX 1774 ti eše
SFX 1774 ti esmo
SFX 1774 ti este
SFX 1774 ti ahu
SFX 1774 ti vši

SFX 1775 Y 28
SFX 1775 uđiti uđiti
SFX 1775 uđiti uđim
SFX 1775 uđiti uđiš
SFX 1775 uđiti uđi
SFX 1775 uđiti uđimo
SFX 1775 uđiti uđite
SFX 1775 uđiti uđe
SFX 1775 uđiti uđio
SFX 1775 uđiti uđila
SFX 1775 uđiti uđilo
SFX 1775 uđiti uđili
SFX 1775 uđiti uđile
SFX 1775 uđiti uđiću
SFX 1775 uđiti uđićeš
SFX 1775 uđiti uđiće
SFX 1775 uđiti uđićemo
SFX 1775 uđiti uđićete
SFX 1775 uđiti uđiće
SFX 1775 uđiti uđi
SFX 1775 uđiti uđimo
SFX 1775 uđiti uđite
SFX 1775 uđiti uđih
SFX 1775 uđiti uđi
SFX 1775 uđiti uđiše
SFX 1775 uđiti uđismo
SFX 1775 uđiti uđiste
SFX 1775 uđiti zuđahu
SFX 1775 uđiti uđivši

SFX 1776 Y 28
SFX 1776 eti eti
SFX 1776 eti etem
SFX 1776 eti eteš
SFX 1776 eti ete
SFX 1776 eti etemo
SFX 1776 eti etete
SFX 1776 eti etu
SFX 1776 eti eo
SFX 1776 eti ela
SFX 1776 eti elo
SFX 1776 eti eli
SFX 1776 eti ele
SFX 1776 eti eću
SFX 1776 eti ećeš
SFX 1776 eti eće
SFX 1776 eti ećemo
SFX 1776 eti ećete
SFX 1776 eti eće
SFX 1776 eti eti
SFX 1776 eti etimo
SFX 1776 eti etite
SFX 1776 eti eh
SFX 1776 eti e
SFX 1776 eti eše
SFX 1776 eti esmo
SFX 1776 eti este
SFX 1776 eti ehu
SFX 1776 eti evši

SFX 1777 Y 28
SFX 1777 sti sti
SFX 1777 sti tem
SFX 1777 sti teš
SFX 1777 sti te
SFX 1777 sti temo
SFX 1777 sti tete
SFX 1777 sti tu
SFX 1777 sti o
SFX 1777 sti la
SFX 1777 sti lo
SFX 1777 sti li
SFX 1777 sti le
SFX 1777 sti šću
SFX 1777 sti šćeš
SFX 1777 sti šće
SFX 1777 sti šćemo
SFX 1777 sti šćete
SFX 1777 sti šće
SFX 1777 sti ti
SFX 1777 sti timo
SFX 1777 sti tite
SFX 1777 sti h
SFX 1777 sti te
SFX 1777 sti še
SFX 1777 sti smo
SFX 1777 sti ste
SFX 1777 sti hu
SFX 1777 sti vši

SFX 1778 Y 27
SFX 1778 ati ati
SFX 1778 ati am
SFX 1778 ati aš
SFX 1778 ati a
SFX 1778 ati amo
SFX 1778 ati ate
SFX 1778 ati a
SFX 1778 ati ao
SFX 1778 ati ala
SFX 1778 ati alo
SFX 1778 ati ali
SFX 1778 ati ale
SFX 1778 ati aću
SFX 1778 ati aćeš
SFX 1778 ati aće
SFX 1778 ati aćemo
SFX 1778 ati aćete
SFX 1778 ati aće
SFX 1778 ati aj
SFX 1778 ati ajmo
SFX 1778 ati ajte
SFX 1778 ati ah
SFX 1778 ati aše
SFX 1778 ati asmo
SFX 1778 ati aste
SFX 1778 ati ahu
SFX 1778 ati ajući

SFX 1779 Y 27
SFX 1779 ti njati
SFX 1779 ti njem
SFX 1779 ti nješ
SFX 1779 ti nje
SFX 1779 ti njemo
SFX 1779 ti njete
SFX 1779 ti nju
SFX 1779 ti o
SFX 1779 ti la
SFX 1779 ti lo
SFX 1779 ti li
SFX 1779 ti le
SFX 1779 ti ću
SFX 1779 ti ćeš
SFX 1779 ti će
SFX 1779 ti ćemo
SFX 1779 ti ćete
SFX 1779 ti će
SFX 1779 ti nji
SFX 1779 ti njimo
SFX 1779 ti njite
SFX 1779 ti h
SFX 1779 ti še
SFX 1779 ti smo
SFX 1779 ti ste
SFX 1779 ti hu
SFX 1779 ti njući

SFX 1780 Y 21
SFX 1780 ći ći
SFX 1780 ći čem
SFX 1780 ći češ
SFX 1780 ći če
SFX 1780 ći čemo
SFX 1780 ći čete
SFX 1780 ći ku
SFX 1780 ći kao
SFX 1780 ći kla
SFX 1780 ći klo
SFX 1780 ći kli
SFX 1780 ći kle
SFX 1780 ći ci
SFX 1780 ći cimo
SFX 1780 ći cite
SFX 1780 ći koh
SFX 1780 ći koše
SFX 1780 ći kosmo
SFX 1780 ći koste
SFX 1780 ći kohu
SFX 1780 ći kući

SFX 1781 Y 27
SFX 1781 kiti kiti
SFX 1781 kiti kim
SFX 1781 kiti kiš
SFX 1781 kiti ki
SFX 1781 kiti kimo
SFX 1781 kiti kite
SFX 1781 kiti ke
SFX 1781 kiti kio
SFX 1781 kiti kila
SFX 1781 kiti kilo
SFX 1781 kiti kili
SFX 1781 kiti kile
SFX 1781 kiti kiću
SFX 1781 kiti kićeš
SFX 1781 kiti kiće
SFX 1781 kiti kićemo
SFX 1781 kiti kićete
SFX 1781 kiti kiće
SFX 1781 kiti ki
SFX 1781 kiti kimo
SFX 1781 kiti kite
SFX 1781 kiti kih
SFX 1781 kiti kiše
SFX 1781 kiti kismo
SFX 1781 kiti kiste
SFX 1781 kiti ahu
SFX 1781 kiti keći

SFX 1782 Y 28
SFX 1782 sti sti
SFX 1782 sti tem
SFX 1782 sti teš
SFX 1782 sti te
SFX 1782 sti temo
SFX 1782 sti tete
SFX 1782 sti tu
SFX 1782 sti o
SFX 1782 sti la
SFX 1782 sti lo
SFX 1782 sti li
SFX 1782 sti le
SFX 1782 sti šću
SFX 1782 sti šćeš
SFX 1782 sti šće
SFX 1782 sti šćemo
SFX 1782 sti šćete
SFX 1782 sti šće
SFX 1782 sti ti
SFX 1782 sti timo
SFX 1782 sti tite
SFX 1782 sti teh
SFX 1782 sti te
SFX 1782 sti toše
SFX 1782 sti tosmo
SFX 1782 sti toste
SFX 1782 sti ćahu
SFX 1782 sti teći

SFX 1783 Y 28
SFX 1783 neti neti
SFX 1783 neti nesem
SFX 1783 neti neseš
SFX 1783 neti nese
SFX 1783 neti nesemo
SFX 1783 neti neste
SFX 1783 neti nesu
SFX 1783 neti neo
SFX 1783 neti nela
SFX 1783 neti nelo
SFX 1783 neti neli
SFX 1783 neti nele
SFX 1783 neti neću
SFX 1783 neti nećeš
SFX 1783 neti neće
SFX 1783 neti nećemo
SFX 1783 neti nećete
SFX 1783 neti neće
SFX 1783 neti nesi
SFX 1783 neti nesimo
SFX 1783 neti nesite
SFX 1783 neti neh
SFX 1783 neti ne
SFX 1783 neti neše
SFX 1783 neti nesmo
SFX 1783 neti neste
SFX 1783 neti njahu
SFX 1783 neti nevši
