Dictionaries/dictionaries-master/sr/sr-Latn.dic
okniti/1769
opovrći/1770
osvrnuti/1771
otići/1772
otreti/1773
otrti/1774
otuđiti/1775
ohrometi/1776
ocvasti/1777
perjati/1778
peti/1779
peći/1780
pirjati/1778
piškiti/1781
plesti/1782
povraneti/1783
pometi/1776
potrti/1774
potuđiti/1775
precvasti/1777
provrći/1770
protrti/1774
procvasti/1777
rascvasti/1777
ucvasti/1777
